New York, session 2025-2026, S7739.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (g) of subdivision 1 of section 4174 of the 2 public health law, as amended by chapter 396 of the laws of 1989, is 3 amended and a new paragraph (h) is added to read as follows: 4 (g) upon request of a board of elections, issue certification of 5 death[.]; or 6 (h) upon request of a cooperative housing corporation, issue a certif- 7 ication of death of a shareholder of such cooperative housing corpo- 8 ration, provided that such cooperative housing corporation submits with 9 such request appropriate documentation of their creditor status. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11882-01-5